Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.274

Sexual assault—Training curriculum modification.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall incorporate victim-centered, trauma-informed approaches to policing in the basic law enforcement training curriculum. In modifying the curriculum, the commission shall seek advice from the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs and other experts on sexual assault and the neurobiology of trauma.

[ 2017 c 290 s 4.]